src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v3_lnr_tulla-dial_Por_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tulla - ok: # Verb 'to bring'
     tulla+V+Inf: tulla
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tulen
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tulet
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tullee
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tulema
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tuletta
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tulhaan
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tulin
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tulit
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuli
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tulima
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tulitta
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tulthiin
     tulla+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tullu
     tulla+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tultu
     tulla+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tulheet
     tulla+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tulleeva
     tulla+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tulleevat
     tulla+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tultava
     tulla+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tultavat
     
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tulisin
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tulisit
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tulis
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tulisimma
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tulisitta
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: tultais
     tulla+V+Pass+Cond: tultais

     tulla+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tule
     tulla+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tulkkaa
     
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tulemassa
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tulemasta
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tulemhaan
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tulemalla
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tulematta
